Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6113.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) If a state agency or local unit of government collects demographic information from an individual for any purpose, the state agency or local unit of government must include the following subcategories for the black, African, or Caribbean categories: (a) A descendant of an individual who was enslaved in United States, American Freedmen. (b) Not a descendant of an individual who was enslaved in United States, American Freedmen. (c) Descendant status is unknown or individual chooses not to identify. (2) This section applies to a state agency beginning on April 1, 2027 and to a local unit of government beginning on January 1, 2027. (3) As used in this section: (a) "African" means an individual who immigrated directly from Africa to the United States or who is a descendant of an individual who immigrated directly from Africa to the United States, and who does not have an ancestor who was enslaved in the United States. (b) "Caribbean" means an individual who immigrated directly from a Caribbean country to the United States or is a descendant of an individual who immigrated directly from a Caribbean country to the United States, and who does not have an ancestor who was enslaved in the United States. (c) "Descendant of an individual who was enslaved in United States, American Freedmen" means an individual who has 1 or more ancestors who were enslaved in the United States. (d) "Local unit of government" means a county, city, village, or township or any combination of counties, cities, villages, or townships. Local unit of government includes an entity created or established by a county, city, village, or township. (e) "State agency" means a state department, board, commission, office, agency, institution, or any other unit of state government.